src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ====================== !
!! # Bokmål noun morphology 
! ====================== !

!!     ---------------------------------------------------
!!     Declension classes
!!     Main types, from Bokmålsordboka
!!     
!!     f1  bru         brua        bruer           bruene
!!     f2  pumpe       pumpa       pumper          pumpene
!!     f3  søster      søstera     søstre/søstrer  søstrene
!!     m1  stol        stolen      stoler          stolene
!!         bakke       bakken      bakker          bakkene
!!         pumpe       pumpen      pumper          pumpene
!!     m2  lærer       læreren     lærere          lærerne
!!     m3  bever       beveren     bevere          beverne
!!                                 bevrer          bevrene
!!                                 bevre           bevrene
!!     m4  longs       longsen     longs/longser   longsene
!!     n1  slott       slottet     slott           slotta/slottene
!!     n2  eple        eplet       epler           epla/eplene
!!         salt        saltet      salter          salta/saltene
!!     n3  kontor      kontoret    kontor/kontorer kontora/kontorene
!!     n4  kriterium   kriteriet   kriterier       kriteria/kriteriene
!!     
!!     Subtypes, mainly from Finsk-norsk ordbok, also system-specific
!!     
!!     mx  unclassified, to m1 by default
!!     mX indecl
!!     m1sg sg only
!!     m1pl pl only
!!     m1b dam
!!     m1b fe, komite
!!     m1V sko pl. sko, skoa/skoene
!!     m1Vb byte, pl. byte/byter, bytene
!!     m1Vc glipp, pl. glipp, glippene
!!     m3V meter pl. meter
!!     m3b finger pl. fingrer/fingre
!!     m3c forelder pl. foreldre
!!     ma alliert, alierte, allierte, allierte
!!     KOLLEGA kollegaer, kolleger
!!     KONTO kontoer, konti
!!     RADIUS radien/radiusen, radier, radiene
!!     BROR brødre
!!     FAR fedre
!!     MANN menn
!      
!!     mD gårde, garde, dage  (av gårde)
!!     fD tide (i tide)
!!     nD live (i live)
!      
!!     DATTER døtre
!!     f1b skam
!!     f1X bok, pl. bøker
!!     f1V mus, pl. mus
!!     fGLO glo, pl. glør
!!     f3b lever. def. levra
!      
!!     n1b rom, def. rommet
!!     n1c søsken, søskenet, søsken, søskena/søsknene
!!     n1n1b publikum, def. publikumet/publikummet
!!     n1s sg only
!!     n2m medlem, pl. medlemmer
!!     n2s mørke, not pl.
!!     n3m program, pl. program/programmer
!!     n3b hinder,   hinderet/hindret,     hinder/hindre,      hindra/hindrene
!!     n3c middel,   middelet/midlet       middel/midler       midla/midlene
!!     n3d lager,    lageret,              lager/lagre,        lagra/lagrene
!!     n3e pulver,   pulveret,             pulver/pulvere,     pulvera/pulverne
!!     n3f beger,    begeret,              beger/begre,        begra/begerne
!!     n3g alter,    alteret/altret,       alter/altere/altre, altera/altra/altrene
!!     n3h tema,     temaet,               tema/temaer,        temaene
!!     n3i rabalder, rabalderet/rabaldret, rabalder/rabaldre,  rabaldra/rabaldrene
!!     n4b faktum,   faktumet,             fakta,              faktaene
!!     n4c nøytrum,  nøytrumet/nøytret,    nøytra/nøytrer,     nøytraene/nøytra/nøytrene
!!     FORUM forum, forumet, fora/forumer, foraene/forumene
!!     LEKSIKON leksikon, pl. leksika
!!     nMUSEUM museum, museet, museer
!!     nØYE



!! ## Basic paradigms
! ===============

LEXICON mD
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
LEXICON fD
+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
LEXICON nD
+N+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ;


LEXICON n1n3
  n1 ;
  n3 ;

LEXICON m1n1
  m1 ;
  n1 ;

LEXICON m1n2
  m1 ;
  n2 ;

!LEXICON m1n1f1
!  m1 ;
!  f1 ;
!  n1 ;

LEXICON n1m1Vc
  n1 ;
  m1Vc ;

LEXICON n1m1V
  n1  ;
  m1V ;

LEXICON n1n1b 
  n1  ;
  n1b ;

LEXICON m3f3
  m3 ;
  f3 ;

LEXICON n2n4b ! multiplum
  n2  ;
  n4b ;

LEXICON n2n3c ! kjørel
  n2  ;
  n3c ;

! Masculines
! ----------

LEXICON mx
!  +X: m1 ; !Temporarily excluding the xX
       m1 ; ! change line back if needed.

LEXICON mX
 +N+Msc+Sg+Indef: K ;
     +N: R ;

!LEXICON mD ! av garde
! +N+Msc+Dat: K ;


LEXICON m4
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef: K ; ! flere stillongs
m1 ;

LEXICON m1 ! dag, hane
 +N: R       ;
     m1morph ;

LEXICON m1-e- ! stut, stuteplage
 +N: Re      ;
     m1morph ;

LEXICON m1morph
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: ar-ane ;

LEXICON m1sg ! bruk
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON m1pl ! gamledager
 +N+Msc+Pl: r-ne ;

LEXICON m1X
         +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:Z1 ar-ane ;
                +N:   R      ;

LEXICON m1b ! dam
         +N+Msc+Sg:mX4 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:m   er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:m   ar-ane ;
                +N:    R      ;

LEXICON m1c ! fe, komite
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: ar-ane ;
                +N: R      ;

LEXICON m1V ! sko
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en    ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: 0-ene-a ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: 0-a   ;
                +N: R       ;

LEXICON m1Vb ! byte
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en     ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: 0-er-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: 0-a   ;
                +N: R        ;

LEXICON m1Vc ! glipp
         +N+Msc+Sg: 0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl: 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG: 0-a   ;
                +N: R     ;

LEXICON m2 ! lærer
 +N+Msc+Sg:        0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:        e-ne   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%^NYNAG 0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%^NYNAG ar-ane ;
        +N:        R      ;


LEXICON m3 ! bever, bevere/bevrer/bevre
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:   e-ne     ; ! bevere, beverne
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                       +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3b ! finger, fingrer/fingre
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                       +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3c ! forelder, foreldre
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 e-ene    ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                       +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3r ! onkel, onkler
                +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en     ;
                +N+Msc+Pl:X1 er-ene   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:X1 ar-ane   ; ! X1 deletes the vowel -e-
                +N:   R        ;

LEXICON m3V ! meter
 +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X1 0-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:X1 0-ane ;
        +N:   R     ;

LEXICON m1n3
  m1 ;
  n3 ;

LEXICON ma ! alliert
 +N+Msc+Sg: 0-e ;
 +N+Msc+Pl: e-e ;
        +N: R   ;


!! #### Irregulars

LEXICON mKOLLEGA
 +N+Msc+Sg:   0-en   ;
 +N+Msc+Pl:X2 er-ene ; ! delete a, kolleger
 +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:   er-ene ; ! keep a, kollegaer
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON mKONTO
         +N+Msc+Sg:     0-en   ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:X2i  0-ene  ; ! delete o
         +N+Msc+Pl+Use/NG:     er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:     ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
                +N:     R      ;

LEXICON mRADIUS
         +N+Msc+Sg:%>us 0-en   ;
     +N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>en K      ; ! short def
         +N+Msc+Pl:     er-ene ; ! Regular pl
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:     ar-ane ; ! Regular pl
                +N:     R      ;

LEXICON mBROR
         +N+Msc+Sg:bror  0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:brødr e-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:brør  0-ne  ;

LEXICON mBRODER
         +N+Msc+Sg:broder 0-en  ;
         +N+Msc+Pl:brødr  e-ene ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:brør   0-ne  ;

LEXICON mFAR
  +N+Msc+Sg:far  0-en  ;
  +N+Msc+Pl:fedr e-ene ;
!           +N:     R     ;

LEXICON mFOT
+N+Msc+Sg:fot   0-en   ;
+N+Msc+Pl:føtt  er-ene ;


LEXICON mMANN
  +N+Msc+Sg:mann   0-en  ;
  +N+Msc+Pl:mannZ1 0-ene ;
!        +N:   R     ;

LEXICON indeclm !mX, eigentleg.
  +N+Msc+Indcl: # ;
!           +N: R ;

! Feminines
! ---------

LEXICON fx ! Former vx, awaiting classification.
  f1 ;
