src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3_letter
fut+CmpNP/None:fut m1-e- ; 
LEXICON Noun
gutt m1-e- ;
sprut m1-e- ;
stut m1-e- ;
yrkesskade m1 ;
image m1n2 ;
opsjonsavtale m1 ;
avbrytelse m1 ;
direktevei m1 ;
flatmeisel m1 ;
hovedfeil m1V ;
skrivefeil m1V ;
programfeil m1V ;
ekteordsfeil m1V ;
legemsfeil m1V ;
brom m1b ;
bånn indeclm ;
folkerettskommisjon m1 ;
glipp m1Vc ;
sportspris m1 ;
atkomst m1 ;
butikkansatt ma ;
kontoransatt ma ;
publikum n1n1b ;
møtepublikum n1n1b ;
kinopublikum n1n1b ;
minoritetspublikum n1n1b ;
minimum n2n4b ;
maksimum n2n4b ;
serum n2n4b ;
futurum n2n4b ;
falsum n2n4b ;
ultimatum n2n4b ;
depositum n2n4b ;
pluskvamperfektum n2n4b ;
kinin m1n1 ;
hark n1m1Vc ;
glepp m1Vc ;
kipp n1m1Vc ;
pass m1Vb ;
skipsreder m2 ;
minimumsalder m3 ;
skifer m3 ;
bedrager m2 ;
luxemburger m2 ;
lydbåndopptager m2 ;
megler m2 ;
gartner m2 ;
savolakser m2 ;
veimester m3 ;
skigåer m2 ;
karbolineum m1n1 ;
kaffein m1n1 ;
koffein m1n1 ;
formalin m1n1 ;
lever m3f3 ;
fiskelever m3f3 ;
dyffel m3r ;
kveiteangel m3r ;
monokkel m3r ;
korsvinkel m3r ;
kalomel m3r ;
førsel m3r ;
drittstøvel m3r ;
treårsalder m3 ;
forelder m3c ;
oldeforelder m3c ;
besteforelder m3c ;
olderforelder m3c ;
svigerforelder m3c ;
fosterforelder m3c ;
småbarnsforelder m3c ;
finger m3b ;
langfinger m3b ;
ringfinger m3b ;
tommelfinger m3b ;
økshammer m3 ;
læremester m3 ;
landbruksminister m3 ;
finansminister m3 ;
nikkel m1n1 ;
kjørel n2n3c ;
crescendo m1n3 ;
dakapo n1n3 ;
duodji m4 ;
longs m4 ;
stillongs m4 ;
tights m4 ;
shorts m4 ;
bermudashorts m4 ;
badeshorts m4 ;
kollega mKOLLEGA ;
arbeidskollega mKOLLEGA ;
tide fD ;
utide fD ;
garde mD ;
gårde mD ;
dage mD ;
topps mD ;
stede nD ;
fjells nD ;
urette mD ;
rette mD ;
froskemann:froske mMANN ;
yngstemann:yngste mMANN ;
vigselmann:vigsel mMANN ;
varaformann:varafor mMANN ;
fylkesmann:fylkes mMANN ;
stortingsmann:stortings mMANN ;
opphavsmann:opphavs mMANN ;
konto mKONTO ;
balansekonto:balansekonto mKONTO ;
bankkonto mKONTO ;
postgirokonto:postgirokonto mKONTO ;
diskonto mKONTO ;
gudfar:gud mFAR ;
oldefar:olde mFAR ;
pleiefar:pleie mFAR ;
skriftefar:skrifte mFAR ;
bestefar:beste mFAR ;
farfar:far mFAR ;
fosterfar:foster mFAR ;
broder: mBRODER ;
urfolksbroder:urfolks mBRODER ;
gudbror:gud mBROR ;
lillebror:lille mBROR ;
navnebror:navne mBROR ;
storebror:store mBROR ;
farbror:far mBROR ;
morbror:mor mBROR ;
værbror:vær mBROR ;
radius:radi mRADIUS ;
aksjonsradius:aksjonsradi mRADIUS ;
fot: mFOT ;
versefot:verse mFOT ;
framfot:fram mFOT ;
mellomfot:mellom mFOT ;
gipsfot:gips mFOT ;
joggesko m1V ;
hestesko m1V ;
vintersko m1V ;
kilo n1m1Vc ;
millimeter m3V ;
centimeter m3V ;
kilometer m3V ;
kvadratkilometer m3V ;
liter m3V ;
desiliter m3V ;
hetkoliter m3V ;
forstad m1X ;
stand m1X ;
bonde m1X ;
melkebonde m1X ;
skattebonde m1X ;
sauebonde m1X ;
swahili m1X ;
styrthjelm m1X ;
antidepressiva mX ;
hevd mX ;
colombi mX ;
mortem mX ;
raison mX ;
slacks mX ;
cand.scient mX ;
alliert ma ;
gjørmedam m1b ;
skinnbrem m1b ;
reinsameungdom m1b ;
mangelsykdom m1b ;
fengselseiendom m1b ;
smålom m1b ;
landsdelsmusé m1b ;
autodafé m1c ;
kafé m1c ;
stamkafé m1c ;
komité m1c ;
kommunalkomité m1c ;
plankomité m1c ;
undervisningskomité m1c ;
administrasjonskomité m1c ;
karate m1sg ;
tyrkisk m1sg ;
dokumentfalsk m1sg ;
kampucheansk m1sg ;
irsk m1sg ;
prosjektmiddelbruk m1sg ;
skolemat m1sg ;
hast m1sg ;
gamledager:gamledage m1pl ;
meslinger:meslinge m1pl ;
brennkopper:brennkoppe m1pl ;
juli indeclm ;
april indeclm ;
februar indeclm ;
september indeclm ;
oktober indeclm ;
august indeclm ;
joikestjerne fx ;
singapore fx ;
mellomøre fx ;
nyperose fx ;
artisjokkhjerte fx ;
unytte fx ;
teve fx ;
enklitisk mx ;
svartedøden mx ;
glip n1m1V ;
høns mx ;
kosmos mx ;
vass mx ;
puss m1n1 ;
modus mKONTO ;
terminus mKONTO ;
ovttadat mx ;
karat m3V ;
skoft m1n1 ;
drent mx ;
garnrå mx ;
kommuneansatt ma ;
ansatt ma ;
enkeltansatt ma ;
fiskeriansatt ma ;
skrivesaker:skrivesake m1pl ;
opptøyer m1pl ;
hockey mX ;
byte m1Vb ;
kilobyte m1Vb ;
megabyte m1Vb ;
gigabyte m1Vb ;
terabyte m1Vb ;
petabyte m1Vb ;
exabyte m1Vb ;
